Utah statutes.
11-7-2.   Contract -- Requirements -- Time in effect.

Any contract made pursuant to Section 11-7-1 shall:

(1)  Be in writing.

(2)  Set forth in detail the extent of the fire protection to be afforded by the party or parties contracting to furnish fire protection.

(3)  Set forth in detail the amount and method of payment to be made by the party or parties.

(4)  Be in effect for at least one year but not more than five years.

